Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5512.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406uu. (1) Not later than 7 calendar days after an insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy receives an application for credentialing, the insurer shall provide the applicant notice of receipt of the application in written or electronic form and contact information for the person reviewing the application. The insurer shall not deny the credentialing process to a health provider applicant because the insurer states no additional health providers are needed. After receiving an application, an insurer shall determine whether the application is complete. If the insurer determines that the application is incomplete, the insurer shall notify the applicant in writing or by electronic means that the application is incomplete not later than 30 calendar days after the date the insurer receives the application. The notice must describe the items that are required to complete the application. The health care provider shall submit a completed credentialing application not later than 30 calendar days after receiving the notice. Failure of the health care provider to submit a completed credentialing application not later than 30 days after receiving the notice will restart the timelines in this subsection. (2) An insurer described in subsection (1) shall conclude the process of credentialing an applicant not later than 60 calendar days after the insurer receives the applicant's application. The 60-calendar-day period must pause if the health care provider receives notification that the health care provider's application is incomplete and must resume after the insurer verifies that the health care provider has resubmitted a completed credentialing application. An insurer shall provide each applicant written or electronic notice of the outcome of the applicant's credentialing at the conclusion of the credentialing process. (3) If an applicant becomes credentialed as a participating health care provider in the insurer's network and a fully executed contract between the health care provider and the insurer is in effect before covered services are being provided, the insurer shall reimburse the applicant for all covered reimbursable health care services provided by the applicant beginning with the date the insurer received a completed credentialing application from the applicant, unless otherwise preempted by federal law. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Applicant" means a health care provider who submits an application to an insurer described in subsection (1) to become credentialed as a participating health care provider in 1 or more of the insurer's provider networks. (b) "Application" means an applicant's most recent application to become credentialed by an insurer described in subsection (1) as a participating health care provider in 1 or more of the insurer's provider networks. (c) "Completed credentialing application" means a credentialing application that is free of defects and contains all of the information that, when later supplemented by verification and documentation gathered by an insurer described in subsection (1) during the primary source verification process, is necessary for the insurer to make a credentialing decision. (d) "Credentialing" means the process by which an insurer described in subsection (1) or its designee collects information concerning an applicant, assesses whether the applicant satisfies the requirements to become a participating health care provider in 1 or more of the insurer's provider networks, verifies all information submitted by the applicant, and approves or denies the applicant's application. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S03922'25) or House Bill No. 5513 (request no. H03922'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.